Wisconsin, session 2025, AB479.
do enact as follows:AB479,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB479,27Section 2. 20.165 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB479,2,11820.165 (2) (b) Cost offsets for 3rd-party-administered trade examinations. The 9amounts in the schedule to reduce the cost of examinations required to obtain an 10occupational license, as defined in s. 101.02 (1) (a) 2., that are administered by a 3rd 11party.AB479,2,1212